Arkansas, session 2025, HB1693.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-615(d), concerning the tabulation of
votes and damaged or defective ballots, is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) If any ballot is damaged or defective so that it cannot
properly be counted by the electronic vote tabulating device, a true
duplicate copy shall be made of the damaged ballot.
(2) When duplicating a ballot, and in the presence of another
election official and designated poll watchers, if any, an election official
shall:
(A) Reproduce the selections of the voter on a second
ballot that is the same ballot style as the ballot cast by the voter;
(B) Stamp or write the word “duplicate” on the duplicated
*SSS215*
03/03/2025 3:04:44 PM SSS215

HB1693
ballot;
(C) Stamp or write the word “original” on the original
damaged or defective ballot;
(D) Label both the original damaged or defective ballot
and the duplicate ballot with the same unique serial number;
(E) Substitute the duplicated ballot for the original
damaged or defective ballot;
(F) Count the duplicated ballots in the same manner as
other ballots in that election; and
(G) Secure and separately store the original damaged or
defective ballots in the same manner as other ballots in that election.
(3) The duplication of a damaged or defective ballot counted at
the central counting facility shall be conducted by an election official at
the same time and location that ballots with no defects are counted.
(4) The duplication of a damaged or defective ballot cast at a
polling site shall be delivered securely to the county board of election
commissioners to be duplicated by election officials or added to the
precinct's count manually on the night of the election.
(5)(4) An election official under subdivision (d)(2) of this
section shall maintain a recorded count of damaged ballots to be duplicated
in the presence of authorized poll watchers, if any, and provide the report
to the county board of election commissioners.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-615, concerning the tabulation of votes
and damaged or defective ballots, is amended to add an additional subsection
to read as follows:
(g) The State Board of Election Commissioners shall promulgate
necessary rules regarding the duplication of damaged or defective ballots
under this section.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 7-5-701(a)(3)(C), concerning the
certification, delivery, and custody of returns of election results, is
amended to read as follows:
(C) On election night for all state and federal elections,
immediately after the count of the vote is complete but no later than twenty-
four (24) hours after polls close on election night, the county board of
03/03/2025 3:04:44 PM SSS215

HB1693
election commissioners shall:
(i) Declare preliminary and unofficial results of
the election, including a statement of the number of outstanding:
(a) Ballots of voters who requested ballots
under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §
20301 et seq.; and
(b) Provisional ballots; and
(c) Number of ballots required to be
duplicated under § 7-5-615; and
(ii) Immediately transmit the results by precinct to
the Secretary of State through the election night reporting interface
provided by the Secretary of State.
























03/03/2025 3:04:44 PM SSS215